Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.606

Liability of general partner and person dissociated as general partner when claim against limited partnership barred.

If a claim against a dissolved limited partnership is barred under RCW 25.10.596 or 25.10.601, any corresponding claim under RCW 25.10.401 is also barred.

[ 2009 c 188 s 808.]